Illinois, session 104th, SB3660.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Radioactive Waste Storage Act is amended by 5changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (420 ILCS 35/6)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 230.6)7    Sec. 6. It is recognized by the General Assembly that any 8site used for the concentration and storage of radioactive 9waste material will represent a continuing and perpetual 10responsibility in the interests of the public health, safety 11and general welfare, and that the same must ultimately be 12reposed in a sovereign government without regard for the 13existence or nonexistence of any particular agency, 14instrumentality, department, division or officer thereof. In 15all instances lands, buildings and grounds which are to be 16designated as sites for the concentration and storage of 17radioactive waste materials shall be acquired in fee simple 18absolute and dedicated in perpetuity to such purpose. All 19rights, title and interest in, of and to any radioactive waste 20materials accepted by IEMA-OHS the Agency for permanent 21storage at such facilities, shall upon acceptance become the 22property of the State and shall be in all respects 23administered, controlled, and disposed of, including transfer   SB3660- 2 -LRB104 18375 WRO 31817 b1by sale, lease, loan or otherwise, by IEMA-OHS the Agency in 2the name of the State. All fees received pursuant to contracts 3entered into by IEMA-OHS the Agency shall be deposited in the 4State Treasury and shall be set apart in a special fund to be 5known as the "Radioactive Waste Site Perpetual Care Fund". 6Monies deposited in the fund shall be expended by IEMA-OHS the 7Agency to monitor and maintain the site as required to protect 8the public health and safety on a continuing and perpetual 9basis. All payments received by IEMA-OHS (formerly the 10Department of Nuclear Safety) the Department of Nuclear Safety 11(now the Agency) pursuant to the settlement agreement entered 12May 25, 1988, in the matter of the People of the State of 13Illinois, et al. v. Teledyne, Inc., et al. (No. 78 MR 25, 14Circuit Court, Bureau County, Illinois) shall be held by the 15State Treasurer separate and apart from all public moneys or 16funds of the State, and shall be used only as provided in such 17settlement agreement. Interest earned by the investment or 18deposit of moneys accumulated in the fund pursuant to the 19settlement agreement shall be deposited into the Radioactive 20Waste Site Perpetual Care Fund for the continued maintenance 21of the Sheffield Low-Level Radioactive Waste Site and the 22surrounding buffer zone. 23(Source: P.A. 103-569, eff. 6-1-24.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.